District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1902

Implied consent to blood-alcohol content or blood-drug content tests; administration; accidents.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1017, Pub. L. 92-519, § 2
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 4(b), (f), 29 DCR 3138
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-174, § 7, 29 DCR 5753
May 5, 1992, D.C. Law 9-96, § 3(b), 38 DCR 7274
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 6(a), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-212, § 4(a), 46 DCR 5
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 152, 47 DCR 520
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 10(a), 53 DCR 8675
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(c)(2), 59 DCR 12957

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-502.
1973 Ed., § 40-1002.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment in subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 16-195, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “alcohol concentration is 0.08 grams or more either per 100 milliliters of blood or per 210 liters of breath or is 0.10 grams or more per 100 milliliters of urine” for “blood contains .08% or more, by weight, of alcohol, or .38 micrograms or more of alcohol are contained in 1 milliliter of that person’s breath, consisting of substantially alveolar air, or that person’s urine contains .10% or more, by weight, of alcohol”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 5(a) of Underage Drinking Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-12, September 11, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 6834).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-198, October 21, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 8988).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) repeal of expiration date of section, see § 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-382, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6697).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-437, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8737).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(f)(1) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-469, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-518, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9104).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-6, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1452).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 101(c)(2) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 101(c)(2) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 101(c)(2) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 101(c)(2) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 12-212

Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 12-212, which provided that the act shall expire on September 30, 2000, was repealed by section 4 of D.C. Law 13-238.